Massachusetts, session 194th, HD5614.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION XX. Section 28 of chapter 32A, as so appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding, after clause (vi), the following clause:- “(vii) prescription
medications related to the provision of gender affirming health care services, as defined in
section 11I½ of chapter 12 intended to last for not more than a 12-month period for any
subsequent dispensing of the same prescription, which may be dispensed all at once or over the
course of the 12-month period, regardless of whether the covered person was enrolled in the
policy at the time the prescription was first dispensed; provided, however, that a corporation
shall not be required to provide coverage for more than one 12-month prescription in a single
dispensing per plan year.”
SECTION XX. Section 10K of Chapter 118E, as so appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by adding, after clause (vi), the following clause:- “(vii) prescription
medications related to the provision of gender affirming health care services, as defined in
of 3

section 11I½ of chapter 12 intended to last for not more than a 12-month period for any
subsequent dispensing of the same prescription, which may be dispensed all at once or over the
course of the 12-month period, regardless of whether the covered person was enrolled in the
policy at the time the prescription was first dispensed; provided, however, that a corporation
shall not be required to provide coverage for more than one 12-month prescription in a single
dispensing per plan year.”
SECTION XX. Section 47W of Chapter 175 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding, after clause (vi), the following clause:-
“(vii) prescription medications related to the provision of gender affirming health care services,
as defined in section 11I½ of chapter 12 intended to last for not more than a 12-month period for
any subsequent dispensing of the same prescription, which may be dispensed all at once or over
the course of the 12-month period, regardless of whether the covered person was enrolled in the
policy at the time the prescription was first dispensed; provided, however, that a corporation
shall not be required to provide coverage for more than one 12-month prescription in a single
dispensing per plan year.”
SECTION XX. Section 8W of Chapter 176A of the General Laws, as so appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding, after clause (vi), the following clause:-
“(vii) prescription medications related to the provision of gender affirming health care services,
as defined in section 11I½ of chapter 12 intended to last for not more than a 12-month period for
any subsequent dispensing of the same prescription, which may be dispensed all at once or over
the course of the 12-month period, regardless of whether the covered person was enrolled in the
policy at the time the prescription was first dispensed; provided, however, that a corporation
of 3

shall not be required to provide coverage for more than one 12-month prescription in a single
dispensing per plan year.”
SECTION XX. Section 4W of Chapter 176B of the General Laws, as so appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding, after clause (vi), the following clause:-
“(vii) prescription medications related to the provision of gender affirming health care services,
as defined in section 11I½ of chapter 12 intended to last for not more than a 12-month period for
any subsequent dispensing of the same prescription, which may be dispensed all at once or over
the course of the 12-month period, regardless of whether the covered person was enrolled in the
policy at the time the prescription was first dispensed; provided, however, that a corporation
shall not be required to provide coverage for more than one 12-month prescription in a single
dispensing per plan year.”
SECTION XX. Section 4O of Chapter 176G of the General Laws, as so appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding, after clause (vi), the following clause:-
“(vii) prescription medications related to the provision of gender affirming health care services,
as defined in section 11I½ of chapter 12 intended to last for not more than a 12-month period for
any subsequent dispensing of the same prescription, which may be dispensed all at once or over
the course of the 12-month period, regardless of whether the covered person was enrolled in the
policy at the time the prescription was first dispensed; provided, however, that a corporation
shall not be required to provide coverage for more than one 12-month prescription in a single
dispensing per plan year.”
of 3